pt-BR: Sistema de notas do oboé: Conservatório; Francês; Outro
sv: Nyckelsystem på oboe: Vinterträdgård; Franska; Övrigt
it: Sistema tonale dell’oboe: Conservatorio; Francese; Altro
nb: Obo-toneart: Vinterhage; Fransk; Annet
fr: Système de clé pour hautbois: Conservatoire; Français; Autre
pl: System kluczy na obój: Oranżeria; francuski; Inne
da: Obonøglesystem: Konservatorie; Fransk; Andet
es: Sistema de llaves del oboe: Conservatorio; Francés; Otros
zh-CN: 双簧管调键系统: 音乐学院; 法语; 其他
tr: Obua anahtar sistemi: Konservatuvar; Fransızca; Diğer
ru: Система гобоя: Консерваторная; Французская; Другая
cs: Systém klapek hoboje: Konzervatoř; francouzština; Jiné
fi: Oboe sävellajijärjestelmä: Conservatory; Ranska; Muu
en: Oboe key system: Conservatory; French; Other
sl-SI: Sistem tipk za oboo: Konzervatoriijski; Francoski; Drugo
de: Tastensystem der Oboe: Wintergarten; Französisch; Sonstiges
ko: 오보에 키 시스템: 온실; 프랑스어; 기타
ja: オーボエのキーシステム: コンセルヴァトワール; フランス語; その他
hr-HR: Sustav tipki za obou: Konzervatorij; Francuski; Ostalo
bg-BG: Ключова система за обой: Консерватория; Френска; Други
vi: Hệ thống phím kèn Oboe: Nhạc viện; Tiếng Pháp; Khác
el: Σύστημα κλειδιών όμποε: Ωδείου; Γαλλική; Άλλο
ro-RO: Sistem de clape pentru oboi: Conservator; Francez; Altele
nl: Sleutelsysteem hobo: Conservatorium; Frans; Andere
sk-SK: Systém klávesov pre hoboj: Konzervatórium; Francúzsky; Iné
pt-PT: Sistema de chaves de oboé: Conservatório; Francês; Outro
lt-LT: Obojaus vožtuvėlių sistema: Konservatorijos; Prancūziška; Kita
zh-TW: 雙簧管調性系統: Conservatory; 法語; 其他
hu: Oboa billentyűrendszere: Konzervatóriumi; Francia; Egyéb
th: ระบบคีย์ของโอโบ: แบบ Conservatory; ภาษาฝรั่งเศส; อื่นๆ